src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
chablagúng:chablagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {chab} to fall through the air" ;
chalagúng:chalagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {cha} to fall through the air" ;
cháamlagung:cháamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {cháam} to fall through the air" ;
da% dlat'ägúng:da% dlat'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to stick their nose into X, interrupt X" ;
dablagúng:dablagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {dab} to fall through the air" ;
dámlagung:dámlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {dám} to fall through the air" ;
dánt'ägung:dánt'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to try to get X to say bad things about other people" ;
dláamlagung:dláamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {dláam} to fall through the air" ;
du%.úng:du%.wáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to be nearby, handy [said of entities not under human control, such as berries, clams or firewood]" ;
galagúng:galagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {ga} to fall through the air" ;
gámlagung:gámlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {gám} to fall through the air" ;
gánglagung:gánglagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {gáng} to fall through the air" ;
gáwlagung:gáwlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {gáw} to fall through the air" ;
gidlangúng:gidlangwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {gid} to fall through the air" ;
gilagúng:gilagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {gi} to fall through the air" ;
gisägúng:gisägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to tell O what bad things to say" ;
gulagúng:gulagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {gu} to fall through the air" ;
gut'ägúng:gut'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to ponder, think hard (about X)" ;
gyáamlagung:gyáamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {gyáam} to fall through the air" ;
gyúu% an-gúng:gyúu% an-gwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to get curious (about X) by hearing people talk (about X)" ;
g̲aagúng:g̲aagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to work hard to make X feel welcome, do their best to welcome X" ;
g̲alagúng:g̲alagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {g̲a} to fall through the air" ;
g̲áamlagung:g̲áamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {g̲áam} to fall through the air" ;
g̲ál% chadáal%.ung:g̲ál% chadáal%.wáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to drag C [net]" ;
ðámlagung:ðámlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {ðám} to fall through the air" ;
hlangä% k̲áa%.ung:hlangä% k̲áa%.wáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to make themselves travel about by having themselves be born in various forms [said of Raven]" ;
hlgalagúng:hlgalagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlga} to fall through the air" ;
hlgáamlagung:hlgáamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlgáam} to fall through the air" ;
hlgilagúng:hlgilagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlgi} to fall through the air" ;
hlg̲alagúng:hlg̲alagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlg̲a} to fall through the air" ;
hlg̲áamlagung:hlg̲áamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlg̲áam} to fall through the air" ;
hlg̲áylagung:hlg̲áylagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlg̲áy} to fall through the air" ;
hlg̲it'ägúng:hlg̲it'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to gun the engine of a boat" ;
hlðámlagung:hlðámlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlðám} to fall through the air" ;
hlkáay% t'agúng:hlkáay% t'agwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to recive an omen by having their chin twitch [said to mean that S will receive some good food]" ;
hlkulagúng:hlkulagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlku} to fall through the air" ;
hlk'ulagúng:hlk'ulagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlk'u} to fall through the air" ;
hlk̲'alagúng:hlk̲'alagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlk̲'a} to fall through the air" ;
hlk̲ámlagung:hlk̲ámlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlk̲ám} to fall through the air" ;
hlk̲'uhllagúng:hlk̲'uhllagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlk̲'uhl} to fall through the air" ;
hlk̲'wáahllagung:hlk̲'wáahllagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlk̲'wáahl} to fall through the air" ;
hlt'ablagung:hlt'ablagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlt'ab} to fall through the air" ;
hlt'ahllagúng:hlt'ahllagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hlt'ahl} to fall through the air" ;
hltáamlagung:hltáamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hltáam} to fall through the air" ;
hltámlagung:hltámlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {hltám} to fall through the air" ;
islagúng:islagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {is} to fall through the air" ;
jah%.lagúng:jah%.lagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {jah} to fall through the air" ;
jalagúng:jalagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {ja} to fall through the air" ;
jíilagung:jíilagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {jíi} to fall through the air" ;
kállagung:kállagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {kál} to fall through the air [said of discrete subject, not mass]" ;
kilagúng:kilagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {ki} to fall through the air" ;
kíndä% k̲áa'ung:kíndä% k̲áa'wáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to walk around (in direction) reporting (to X1) (on X2), to walk around informing X1 about X2" ;
k'úllagung:k'úllagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {k'úl} to fall through the air" ;
k'úugä% t'agúng:k'úugä% t'agwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to receive an omen by having their heart twitch [said to mean bad news is coming]" ;
k'wáahllagung:k'wáahllagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {k'wáahl} to fall through the air" ;
k̲ablagúng:k̲ablagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {k̲ab} to fall through the air" ;
k̲asaa% k̲áa%.ung:k̲asaa% k̲áa%.wáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (sg) to walk around getting ready to leave, go around loading vehicle getting ready to leave" ;
k̲'íilagung:k̲'íilagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {k̲'íi} to fall through the air [either mass or discrete]" ;
k̲'usägúng:k̲'usägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to bum food" ;
k̲'wáant'ägung:k̲'wáant'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to snap, pop [said of fire]" ;
núut'ägung:núut'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to hunt octopus" ;
sáanä% k̲áa%.ung:sáanä% k̲áa%.wáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to relax outside by walking around" ;
sdalagúng:sdalagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {sda} to fall through the air" ;
sgablagúng:sgablagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {sgab} to fall through the air" ;
sgáamlagung:sgáamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {sgáam} to fall through the air" ;
sgi% k̲'íit'ägung:sgi% k̲'íit'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to fornicate [said of either men or women]" ;
sg̲alagúng:sg̲alagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {sg̲a} to fall through the air" ;
sk'alagúng:sk'alagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {sk'a} to fall through the air" ;
sk'ánt'ägung:sk'ánt'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to push their way through an obstruction <in location> <in direction>" ;
smállagung:smállagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {smál} to fall through the air" ;
stl'alagúng:stl'alagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {stl'a} to fall through the air" ;
stlúulagung:stlúulagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {stlúu} to fall through the air" ;
ta% jat'ägúng:ta% jat'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to shoot here and there" ;
t'ablagúng:t'ablagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {t'ab} to fall through the air" ;
t'alagúng:t'alagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {t'a} to fall through the air" ;
t'ámlagung:t'ámlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {t'ám} to fall through the air" ;
tíilagung:tíilagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {tíi} to fall through the air" ;
tlat'ägúng:tlat'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to rub hands on X" ;
tlúu% g̲ut'íisaa% t'agúng:tlúu% g̲ut'íisaa% t'agwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to receive an omen by having their right hip twitch [said to mean a coming pleasant visit from another village]" ;
ts'a% sk'ált'ägung:ts'a% sk'ált'ägwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S to guess repeatedly (at X)" ;
xablagúng:xablagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {xab} to fall through the air" ;
xáamlagung:xáamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {xáam} to fall through the air" ;
xwáadlagung:xwáadlagwáang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {xwáad} to fall through the air" ;
x̲áamlagung:x̲áamlagwaang CLASS-UNG-STEM-2 "for S (pl) {x̲áam} to fall through the air" ;
